Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,169
Solicitation of enrollees; other law; how construed.

Solicitation of enrollees by a health maintenance organization granted a certificate of authority or its representatives shall not be construed to violate any provision of law relating to solicitation or advertising by health professionals.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 78.